District of Columbia statutes.
5-1113

Effect of order dismissing complaint.

(a)

An order of the Executive Director dismissing a complaint shall be a final resolution of the complaint by the Office. Such order shall be neither appealable to nor reviewable by any other entity, administrative or judicial.

(b)

An order of the Executive Director dismissing a complaint for any reason, including a dismissal based upon an adjudication of the merits of a complaint by a complaint examiner and a decision of a final review panel that reverses a merits determination of a complaint examiner, shall not bar the complainant from seeking any judicial relief that may be available pursuant to the statutory and common law of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-208, § 14, 45 DCR 8107
1981 Ed., § 4-923.